Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20268-2751
Act; changes made by Laws 2026, LB838; applicability to licenses and applications; director; determine compliance; revocation of license; grounds.

(1) On July 18, 2026, the changes made by Laws 2026, LB838, shall apply to all existing and future licenses and applications for license under the Nebraska Money Transmitters Act.

(2) Within sixty days after July 18, 2026, the director shall send a written request to each licensee and applicant with a completed application that requests supplemental information necessary for the director to investigate and determine compliance with the changes made by Laws 2026, LB838, including the certifications required by section 8-2711. For any licensee that does not provide such information within sixty days after receiving such request or that the director has reasonable suspicion to believe is a foreign adversary person or has any key individual or person in control that is a foreign adversary person, the director shall institute proceedings under section 8-2734 to revoke the licensee's license.

Laws 2026, LB838, § 7.
July 18, 2026